Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 10. General Provisions.

Sec. 42.40.900.
Claims.

All claims and lawsuits involving activities of the railroad, including suits in contract, quasi-contract, or tort, shall be brought against the corporation and not against the state.

For the purposes of actionable claims, undertakings, payments of judgments, execution, interest, punitive damages, statutes of limitations, bonds, costs, and similar matters related to the presentation and prosecution of claims by and against the corporation, the corporation and its board members and employees enjoy the same rights, privileges, and immunities as the state and state officers.

Claims against the corporation are not subject to the provisions of AS 44.77 regarding claims against the state.

The corporation is not subject to the provisions of AS

44.80.010

, regarding the state as a party to an action.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.905.
Notice of legal actions.

The corporation shall notify the Department of Law within 30 days before initiating legal action unless special circumstances exist that require immediate legal action to protect the corporation assets or to continue existing service.

If notice of legal action is not given under (a) of this section, within seven days of taking action the board shall notify the Department of Law of the action taken and of the special circumstances that exempted the action from the requirements of (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.910.
Exemption from taxation.

The exercise of the powers granted by this chapter shall be in all respects for the benefit of the people of the state, for their well-being and prosperity, and for the improvement of their social and economic conditions. Subject to (b) of this section, the real and personal property of the corporation and its assets, income, and receipts are exempt from all taxes and special assessments of the state or a political subdivision of the state.

Bonds and notes issued under this chapter are issued by a body corporate and public of the state and for an essential public and governmental purpose. Therefore, the bonds and notes, the interest and income from them, and all fees, charges, funds, revenue, income, and other money pledged or available to pay or secure the payment of the bonds and notes or interest on them, are exempt from taxation except for inheritance, transfer, and estate taxes.

This section does not affect or limit an exemption from license fees, property taxes, or excise, income, or other taxes, provided under any other law, nor does it create a tax exemption with respect to the interest of any business enterprise or other person, other than the corporation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.915.
Transportation of members of the Alaska organized militia.

To the extent that space is available, the corporation shall provide free transportation on the Alaska Railroad for a member of the Alaska National Guard, the Alaska Naval Militia, or the Alaska State Defense Force who is en route to or from drill, training, or other official militia activities.

History.

(§ 5 ch 25 SLA 2000)

Sec. 42.40.920.
Application of existing laws.

[Repealed, § 38 ch 168 SLA 1990.]

Unless specifically provided otherwise in this chapter, the following laws do not apply to the operations of the corporation:

AS 19;

AS 30.15;

AS 35;

AS 36.30, except as specifically provided in that chapter;

AS 37.05, except as specifically provided in AS

37.05.210

;

AS 37.07;

AS

37.10.010

—

37.10.060

;

AS

37.10.085

;

AS 37.20;

AS 37.25;

AS 38;

AS

44.62.010

—

44.62.319

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984; am § 41 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 38 ch 168 SLA 1990; am § 6 ch 83 SLA 1999; am § 10 ch 7 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective August 1, 2018, in (b)(12), substituted “AS

44.62.010

–

44.62.319

” for “AS

44.62.010

–

44.62.320

”.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Alaska Railroad is not required to award leases of railroad lands by competitive bidding, since, under subsection (b)(10) (now see (b)(11)), the Alaska Railroad is specifically exempted from the requirements of AS 38. March 8, 1985, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 42.40.930.
Conflicting laws inapplicable.

If provisions of this chapter conflict with the provisions of other state law, the provisions of this chapter prevail. Provisions of this chapter shall be construed so that they do not conflict with 45 U.S.C. 1201
— 1214 (Alaska Railroad Transfer Act of 1982).

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.935.
Railroad facilities code compliance.

Not later than two years after the date of transfer the corporation in consultation with the Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall develop and adopt a plan to achieve compliance with AS 18.60. The plan shall be implemented and compliance achieved within five years after it is adopted.

No later than two years after the date of transfer, the corporation in consultation with the Department of Public Safety and appropriate municipal officials, shall develop and adopt a plan to achieve compliance with building and related safety codes applicable to facilities of the corporation. The plan shall be implemented and compliance achieved within five years after it is adopted. In the sole determination of the commissioner of public safety, any existing building owned or controlled by the corporation that does not present a serious safety hazard and for which compliance would be uneconomical in consideration of its remaining useful life shall be exempted from compliance with state or municipal safety codes.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (a) of this section, “Department of Labor” was changed to read “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 42.40.940.
Sale or lease of the railroad.

The governor may provide for the sale or lease of the Alaska Railroad and dissolve the corporation if

it can be assured that the railroad will continue to operate after the sale or lease; and

under the terms of the sale or lease, the state will receive the amount of money it has spent in connection with the Alaska Railroad.

A sale under this section is subject to approval by law.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.950.
Reversion of assets.

Except as provided in AS

42.40.940

, if the corporation ceases to exist its assets revert to the state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.980.
Definitions.

In this chapter unless the context otherwise requires,

“board” means the board of directors of the Alaska Railroad Corporation;

“bonds” means bonds, bond anticipation notes, notes, refunding bonds, or other obligations;

“collective bargaining” means the performance of the mutual obligation of the corporation or its designated representatives and the representatives of the employees to meet at reasonable times, including meetings in advance of the budget making process, and negotiating in good faith with respect to wages, hours, and other terms and conditions of employment, or the negotiation of an agreement, or negotiation of a question arising under an agreement and the execution of a written contract incorporating an agreement reached if requested by either party, but these obligations do not compel either party to agree to a proposal or require the making of a concession;

“corporation” means the Alaska Railroad Corporation;

“date of transfer” means the date on which the United States Secretary of Transportation delivers the transfer documents under 45 U.S.C. 1201 — 1214 (Alaska Railroad Transfer Act of 1982);

“employees” means all persons employed by the corporation including executive officers;

“executive officer” means the corporation’s chief executive officer, assistant chief executive officer, assistant to the chief executive officer, chief of administration, superintendent of transportation, manager of marketing and sales, chief engineer, chief mechanical officer, manager of industrial development and real estate, manager of budget and accounting, manager of planning, manager of personnel, manager of supply and procurement, chief of security, manager of operating rules, manager of data processing, manager of strategy, manager of operations planning, manager of supply, manager of procurement, manager of safety, manager of administrative procedure, chief counsel, or, if so designated by the board, any employee who fulfills these management functions under a different title or who exercises a similar or comparable level of responsibility or supervision;

“land” means any interest in real property, including tide and submerged land, and any right appurtenant to the interest;

“rule” means a standard of general application or the amendment, supplement, revision, or repeal of a standard adopted by the corporation to implement, interpret, or make specific the law enforced or administered by it or to govern its procedure;

“terms and conditions of employment” means the hours of employment, the compensation and fringe benefits, and the employer’s personnel policies affecting the working conditions of the employees, but does not mean the general policies describing the function and purposes of an employer.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Revisor’s notes. —

The actual date of transfer under paragraph (5) of this section is January 5, 1985.

Sec. 42.40.990.
Short title.

This chapter may be referred to as the Alaska Railroad Corporation Act.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)